Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201621-2,171
Definitions.

(MBCA 13.01) In sections 21-2,171 to 21-2,183:

(1) Affiliate means a person
that directly or indirectly through one or more intermediaries controls, is
controlled by, or is under common control with another person or is a senior
executive thereof. For purposes of subdivision (6) of this section, a person
is deemed to be an affiliate of its senior executives.

(2) Beneficial shareholder
means a person who is the beneficial owner of shares held in a voting trust
or by a nominee on the beneficial owner's behalf.

(3) Corporation means the issuer of
the shares held by a shareholder demanding appraisal and, for matters covered
in sections 21-2,176 to 21-2,182, includes the surviving entity in a merger.

(4) Fair value means the
value of the corporation's shares determined:

(i) Immediately before the effectuation
of the corporate action to which the shareholder objects;

(ii) Using customary and
current valuation concepts and techniques generally employed for similar businesses
in the context of the transaction requiring appraisal; and

(iii) Without discounting
for lack of marketability or minority status except, if appropriate, for amendments
to the articles pursuant to subdivision (a)(5) of section 21-2,172.

(5) Interest means interest
from the effective date of the corporate action until the date of payment
at the rate of interest specified in section 45-104, as such rate may from
time to time be adjusted by the Legislature.

(6) Interested transaction means a corporate
action described in subsection (a) of section 21-2,172, other than a merger
pursuant to section 21-2,165, involving an interested person in which any
of the shares or assets of the corporation are being acquired or converted.
As used in this definition:

(i)
Interested person means a person or an affiliate of a person who at any time
during the one-year period immediately preceding approval by the board of
directors of the corporate action:

(A) Was the beneficial owner of twenty percent or
more of the voting power of the corporation, other than as owner of excluded
shares;

(B)
Had the power, contractually or otherwise, other than as owner of excluded
shares, to cause the appointment or election of twenty-five percent or more
of the directors to the board of directors of the corporation; or

(C) Was a senior executive
or director of the corporation or a senior executive of any affiliate thereof
and that senior executive or director will receive, as a result of the corporate
action, a financial benefit not generally available to other shareholders
as such, other than:

(I)
Employment, consulting, retirement, or similar benefits established separately
and not as part of or in contemplation of the corporate action;

(II) Employment, consulting,
retirement, or similar benefits established in contemplation of or as part
of the corporate action that are not more favorable than those existing before
the corporate action or, if more favorable, that have been approved on behalf
of the corporation in the same manner as is provided in section 21-2,122;
or

(III)
In the case of a director of the corporation who will, in the corporate action,
become a director of the acquiring entity in the corporate action or one of
its affiliates, rights and benefits as a director that are provided on the
same basis as those afforded by the acquiring entity generally to other directors
of such entity or such affiliate;

(ii) Beneficial owner means any person who, directly
or indirectly, through any contract, arrangement, or understanding, other
than a revocable proxy, has or shares the power to vote or to direct the voting
of shares; except that a member of a national securities exchange is not deemed
to be a beneficial owner of securities held directly or indirectly by it on
behalf of another person solely because the member is the record holder of
the securities if the member is precluded by the rules of the exchange from
voting without instruction on contested matters or matters that may affect
substantially the rights or privileges of the holders of the securities to
be voted. When two or more persons agree to act together for the purpose of
voting their shares of the corporation, each member of the group formed thereby
is deemed to have acquired beneficial ownership, as of the date of the agreement,
of all voting shares of the corporation beneficially owned by any member of
the group; and

(iii)
Excluded shares means shares acquired pursuant to an offer for all shares
having voting power if the offer was made within one year prior to the corporate
action for consideration of the same kind and of a value equal to or less
than that paid in connection with the corporate action.

(7) Preferred shares means
a class or series of shares whose holders have preference over any other class
or series with respect to distributions.

(8) Record shareholder means the person in whose name
shares are registered in the records of the corporation or the beneficial
owner of shares to the extent of the rights granted by a nominee certificate
on file with the corporation.

(9)
Senior executive means the chief executive officer, chief operating officer,
chief financial officer, and anyone in charge of a principal business unit
or function.

(10)
Shareholder means both a record shareholder and a beneficial shareholder.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 171.
January 1, 2017